Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 75 Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973
12-75-126. Public safety officers.

No person shall be employed or associated in any capacity in any emergency management organization established under this chapter who:

The Director of the Division of Emergency Management and persons he or she may designate from the state and local offices of emergency management staffing patterns shall be sworn public safety officers as defined and limited by this chapter.

(1)Before entering upon his or her duties, each person who is selected to serve as a public safety officer in an organization of emergency management shall take an oath in writing before a person authorized to administer oaths in this state.

The oath required in subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be substantially as follows:

(1)(A)The director may determine what constitutes the Division of Emergency Management uniform for division personnel.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 21; 1985, No. 687, § 9; 1985, No. 978, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1954; Acts 1999, No. 646, § 33; 2007, No. 197, § 17; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5899-5902.

12-75-127. [Repealed.]

(A) Subdivision (e)(1) of this section does not apply to a license issued to a health practitioner, as defined in §12-87-102.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 16; 1981, No. 891, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1949; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 53; 2007, No. 197, § 19; 2009, No. 165, §§ 49-52; 2009, No. 432, § 2.

12-75-129. Emergency responders — Workers' compensation benefits.

(1)A person appointed and regularly enrolled in an accredited emergency management organization and covered by this chapter is limited to the Workers' Compensation Law, §11-9-101 et seq., for benefits payable for an injury to or death of the person, if:

If a person described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section is a qualified emergency responder of the state or a local office of emergency management, then recovery is limited as provided in this section.

If an emergency responder is injured or killed while subject to the order or control of a local government, compensation and benefits shall be charged against the applicable local government's experience rate and paid from the appropriate state workers' compensation fund.

(1)For the purpose of subsection (c) of this section, the weekly compensation benefits for such emergency responders who receive no monetary compensation for services rendered as such workers shall be calculated based upon the wages received from their regular or usual employments, the same as a regular local or state employee, with respect to injury, disability, or death.

The reimbursement per day for approved out-of-pocket expenses incurred in response to an emergency situation, such as gasoline, oil, uniforms, required equipment, and other items is not considered monetary compensation for the volunteer emergency responder.

(1)In the event that any person who is entitled to receive benefits through the application of subsection (c) of this section receives, in connection with the injury, disability, or death giving rise to such entitlement, benefits under an act of the United States Congress or federal program providing benefits for emergency responders or their survivors, then the benefits payable under this section shall be reduced to the extent of the benefits received under such other act or program.

Any person who performs the duties of a member or trainee as an adjunct to his or her regular employment and who otherwise would be entitled to receive workers' compensation benefits for his or her injury, disability, or death, if injured in the performance of such duties, shall be deemed to have been injured, disabled, or killed in the course of his or her regular employment.

An emergency responder shall be deemed duly registered and qualified when he or she is a member of and has on file in either a local office of emergency management or in the division the following information:

Name and address;

Date enrolled; and

Class of service assigned.

Payments and death and disability benefits as provided in this section shall be made from the Workers' Compensation Revolving Fund for state employees.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 511, § 22; 1977, No. 408, § 6; 1981, No. 891, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1955; Acts 1999, No. 646, §§ 35, 36; 2007, No. 197, § 20; 2009, No. 165, §§ 53-55; 2019, No. 910, §§
5903, 5904.

12-75-130. Call-up of retired law enforcement officers.

In emergency situations the Governor, county sheriff, or municipal police chief may authorize and request retired law enforcement officers, including game wardens, to perform law enforcement functions.

In such instances, the retirement benefits of such retired law enforcement officers shall not be interrupted, reduced, or otherwise adversely affected.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 31, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-1958.

12-75-131. Disaster relief pay.

(1)The Division of Emergency Management is authorized to provide special compensation to certain employees for each full pay period of eighty (80) hours worked in a job which requires the provision of on-site emergency disaster relief services in cases of wartime, human-made, or natural disasters.

This disaster relief pay covers employees who may be exposed to hazardous or disastrous conditions during the performance of their job duties.

(A)The rate of pay will be five and one-half percent (5.5%) above the regular authorized pay or rate of pay.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1028, § 14; 1999, No. 646, §§ 37, 38; 2019, No. 910, §§
5905, 5906.

12-75-132. Arkansas Homeland Security Advisory Group — Created.

Division of Emergency Management;

The Arkansas Ambulance Association;

Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police;

A representative of the Division of Emergency Management shall serve as chair of the advisory group.

The advisory group shall develop and maintain comprehensive guidelines and procedures that address requirements for the following:

Requesting and providing assistance through the statewide mutual aid system;

Recordkeeping for all participating emergency jurisdictions;

Reimbursement for assistance provided through the statewide mutual aid system; and

Any other process necessary to implement the statewide mutual aid system.

The advisory group shall meet as often as required to:

Review the progress and status of statewide emergency programs;

Assist in developing methods to track and evaluate activation of the statewide mutual aid system; and

Examine issues facing emergency jurisdictions regarding the implementation and management of the statewide mutual aid system.

(1)The advisory group shall prepare at least annually a report on the condition and effectiveness of the statewide mutual aid system and other emergency programs in the state.

The report shall include recommendations with regard to correcting any deficiencies identified by the advisory group in the statewide mutual aid system.

The advisory group shall submit the report annually to the director and to the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 1179, § 3; 2007, No. 751, § 6; 2009, No. 165, § 56; 2017, No. 707, § 21; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5907, 5908.

12-75-133. Position transfer.

Upon approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Arkansas Department of Emergency Management may transfer positions between appropriations as may be required:

If a disaster occurs that results in a presidential disaster proclamation; or

When an employee occupies one (1) position that is to be paid from two (2) or more appropriations during a single fiscal year.

Publisher's Notes. This section was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 165, § 58. The section was derived from Acts 1997, No. 1069, § 19; 1999, No. 1427, § 16.

For current law, see §12-75-133.

Cross References. Arkansas Emergency Services Act of 1973, §12-75-101 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1989, No. 247, § 10: Feb. 24, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that this Act is designed to charge the Office of Emergency Services with full responsibility of administering the Earthquake Preparedness Program and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

History.

Acts 2009, No. 165, § 57.

Subchapter 2

— Employees

12-75-201. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 1

— Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact

12-76-101. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact”.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 232, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-2001.

12-76-102. Enactment of compact into law.

The Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact is enacted into law and entered into with all jurisdictions legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

INTERSTATE CIVIL DEFENSE AND DISASTER COMPACT

ARTICLE I

The purpose of this compact is to provide mutual aid among the states in meeting any emergency or disaster from enemy attack, natural cause, or other cause. The prompt, full, and effective utilization of the resources of the respective states, including such resources as may be available from the United States Government or any other source, are essential to the safety, care, and welfare of the people thereof in the event of enemy action or other emergency, and any other resources including personnel, equipment, or supplies shall be incorporated into a plan or plans of mutual aid to be developed among the civil defense agencies or similar bodies of the states that are parties hereto. The Directors of Civil Defense of all party states shall constitute a committee to formulate plans to take all necessary steps for the implementation of this contract.

ARTICLE II

It shall be the duty of each party state to formulate civil defense plans and programs for application within such state. There shall be frequent consultation between the representatives of the states and with the United States Government and the free exchange of information and plans, including inventories of any materials and equipment available for civil defense. In carrying out such civil defense plans and programs, the party states shall, so far as possible, provide and follow uniform standards, practices, and rules and regulations including:

(a)

Insignia and any other distinctive articles to designate and distinguish the different civil defense services;

(b)

Mobilization of civil defense forces and other tests and exercises;

(c)

Warnings and signals for drills or attacks and the mechanical devices to be used in connection therewith;

(d)

Shutting off water mains, gas mains, electric power connections, and the suspension of all other utility services;

(e)

All materials or equipment used or to be used for civil defense purposes in order to assure that such materials and equipment will be easily and freely interchangeable when used in or by any other party state;

(f)

The conduct of civilians and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic, prior, during, and subsequent to drills or attacks or disasters;

(g)

The safety of public meetings or gatherings;

(h)

Standardized data bank of response and recovery resources; and

(i)

Disaster forecasts and reports.

ARTICLE III

Any party state requested to render mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided that it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such state. Each party state shall extend to the civil defense forces of any other party state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers (except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state), duties, rights, privileges, and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the state in which normally employed or rendering services. Civil defense forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the civil defense authorities of the state receiving assistance.

ARTICLE IV

Whenever any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, such person may render aid involving such skill in any party state to meet an emergency or disaster, and such state shall give due recognition to such license, certificate, or other permit as if issued in the state in which aid is rendered.

ARTICLE V

No party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged, or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith.

ARTICLE VI

Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two (2) or more states may differ from that appropriate among other states party hereto, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing herein contained shall preclude any state from entering into supplementary agreements with another state or states. Such supplementary agreements may complement, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons, and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation, and communications personnel, equipment and supplies.

ARTICLE VII

Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the civil defense forces of that state and the representatives of deceased members of such forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within such state.

ARTICLE VIII

Any party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving such aid for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in, the operation of any equipment answering a request for aid, and for the cost incurred in connection with such requests, including amounts paid under Article VII; provided, that any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part such loss, damage, expense, or other cost, or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party state without charge or cost; and provided further that any two (2) or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs as among those states. The United States Government may relieve the party state receiving aid from any liability and reimburse the party state supplying civil defense forces for compensation paid to and the transportation, subsistence, and maintenance expenses of such forces during the time of the rendition of such aid or assistance outside the state and may also pay fair and reasonable compensation for the use or utilization of the supplies, materials, equipment, or facilities so utilized or consumed. The State of Arkansas will only honor reimbursement claims from other states rendering aid to Arkansas to the same level of reimbursement and for the same items or areas of cost as each of those states' interstate compact laws provide to requesting states.

ARTICLE IX

Plans for the orderly evacuation and reception of the civilian population as the result of an emergency or disaster shall be worked out from time to time between representatives of the party states and the various local civil defense areas thereof. Such plans shall include the manner of transporting such evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing, and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends, and the forwarding of such evacuees to other areas or the bringing in of additional materials, supplies, and all other relevant factors. Such plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees shall be reimbursed generally for the out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for such evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care, and like items. Such expenditures shall be reimbursed by the party state of which the evacuees are residents, or by the United States Government under plans approved by it. After the termination of the emergency or disaster, the party state of which the evacuees are resident shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support or repatriation of such evacuees.

ARTICLE X

This compact shall be available to any state, territory, or possession of the United States, and the District of Columbia. The term “state” may also include any neighboring foreign country or province or state thereof.

ARTICLE XI

The committee established pursuant to Article I of this compact may request the Federal Emergency Management Agency, or its successor, of the United States Government to act as an informational and coordinating body under this compact, and representatives of such agency of the United States Government may attend meetings of such committee.

ARTICLE XII

This compact shall become operative immediately upon its ratification by any state as between it and any other state or states so ratifying and shall be subject to approval by Congress unless prior congressional approval has been given. Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and the Federal Emergency Management Agency, or its successor, and other appropriate agencies of the United States Government.

ARTICLE XIII

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding on each party state until the legislature or the Governor of such party state takes action to withdraw therefrom. Such action shall not be effective until thirty (30) days after notice thereof has been sent by the Governor of the party state desiring to withdraw to the Governors of all other party states.

ARTICLE XIV

This compact shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in Article I hereof. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

ARTICLE XV

It has been found and declared by the General Assembly of Arkansas that there is an immediate necessity to hasten the completion of plans to prepare this state and people thereof against the possibilities of disaster resulting from enemy attack, sabotage, or other hostile action or from natural disasters, such as fire, flood, earthquake, or other natural causes, and that enactment of this bill will hasten completion of such plans. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, this chapter being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in force and operation from the date of its approval.

ARTICLE XVI

DEFINITIONS:

(1)

“Civil defense” shall be used here to be synonymous with emergency services, emergency management, or future terms denoting an emergency or disaster response organization or capability with the chief goal of protecting life, limb, and/or property of citizens that could be lost because of a disaster agent.

(2)

“Civil defense forces” means all state, county, and local government agencies, departments, offices, and personnel, qualified emergency service workers as defined by §12-75-103, and all private volunteer citizens called upon by state officials to provide emergency service in response to a disaster agent or to one that is pending.

(3)

“State employees” include all persons paid wages or salaries by the State of Arkansas, all qualified emergency service workers as defined by §12-75-103, and all private volunteer Arkansas citizens called upon by state officials to provide emergency services.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 232, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 11-2002; Acts 1989, No. 247, §§ 3-6.

Publisher's Notes. The Interstate Civil Defense and Disaster Compact was approved by the General Assembly on March 7, 1973.

Subchapter 2

— Emergency Management Assistance Compact

A.C.R.C. Notes. This subchapter was formerly codified as §12-49-401 et seq.

Due to the transfer of former §12-49-401 et seq. to this chapter, the preexisting provisions of this chapter have been designated as Subchapter 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 959, § 3: Mar. 31, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that due to the potential danger posed to the citizens of the State of Arkansas by natural, man-made disaster, or act of war, there is an immediate need to implement the provisions of this act in the interest of public safety and welfare. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

12-76-201. Short title.

This subchapter may be cited as the “Emergency Management Assistance Compact”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 959, § 1.

12-76-202. Text of Compact.

The Emergency Management Assistance Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other states which adopt the compact in a form substantially as follows:

Emergency Management Assistance Compact

ARTICLE I — PURPOSE AND AUTHORITIES

This compact is made and entered into by and between the participating member states which enact this compact, hereinafter called party states. For the purposes of this agreement, the term “states” is taken to mean the several states, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the District of Columbia, and all U.S. territorial possessions.

The purpose of this compact is to provide for mutual assistance between the states entering into this compact in managing any emergency or disaster that is duly declared by the governor of the affected state(s), whether arising from natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, civil emergency aspects of resources shortages, community disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack.

This compact shall also provide for mutual cooperation in emergency- related exercises, testing, or other training activities using equipment and personnel simulating performance of any aspect of the giving and receiving of aid by party states or subdivisions of party states during emergencies, such actions occurring outside actual declared emergency periods. Mutual assistance in this compact may include the use of the states' National Guard forces, either in accordance with the National Guard Mutual Assistance Compact or by mutual agreement between states.

ARTICLE II — GENERAL IMPLEMENTATION

Each party state entering into this compact recognizes many emergencies transcend political jurisdictional boundaries and that intergovernmental coordination is essential in managing these and other emergencies under this compact. Each state further recognizes there will be emergencies which require immediate access and present procedures to apply outside resources to make a prompt and effective response to such an emergency. This is because few, if any, individual states have all the resources they may need in all types of emergencies or the capability of delivering resources to areas where emergencies exist.

The prompt, full and effective utilization of resources of the participating states, including any resources on hand or available from the Federal Government or any other source, that are essential to the safety, care, and welfare of the people in the event of any emergency or disaster declared by a party state, shall be the underlying principle on which all articles of this compact shall be understood.

On behalf of the governor of each state participating in the compact, the legally designated state official who is assigned responsibility for emergency management will be responsible for formulation of the appropriate interstate mutual aid plans and procedures necessary to implement this compact.

ARTICLE III — PARTY STATE RESPONSIBILITIES

A.

It shall be the responsibility of each party state to formulate procedural plans and programs for interstate cooperation in the performance of the responsibilities listed in this article. In formulating such plans, and in carrying them out, the party states, insofar as practical, shall:

i.

Review individual state hazards analyses and, to the extent reasonably possible, determine all those potential emergencies the party states might jointly suffer, whether due to natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster, emergency aspects of resource shortages, civil disorders, insurgency, or enemy attack.

ii.

Review party states' individual emergency plans and develop a plan which will determine the mechanism for the interstate management and provision of assistance concerning any potential emergency.

iii.

Develop interstate procedures to fill any identified gaps and to resolve any identified inconsistencies or overlaps in existing or developed plans.

iv.

Assist in warning communities adjacent to or crossing the state boundaries.

v.

Protect and assure uninterrupted delivery of services, medicines, water, food, energy and fuel, search and rescue, and critical lifeline equipment, services, and resources, both human and material.

vi.

Inventory and set procedures for the interstate loan and delivery of human and material resources, together with procedures for reimbursement or forgiveness.

vii.

Provide, to the extent authorized by law, for temporary suspension of any statutes or ordinances that restrict the implementation of the above responsibilities.

B.

The authorized representative of a party state may request assistance of another party state by contacting the authorized representative of that state. The provisions of this agreement shall only apply to requests for assistance made by and to authorized representatives. Requests may be verbal or in writing. If verbal, the request shall be confirmed in writing within 30 days of the verbal request. Requests shall provide the following information:

i.

A description of the emergency service function for which assistance is needed, such as but not limited to fire services, law enforcement, emergency medical, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, building inspection, planning and information assistance, mass care, resource support, health and medical services, and search and rescue.

ii.

The amount and type of personnel, equipment, materials and supplies needed, and a reasonable estimate of the length of time they will be needed.

iii.

The specific place and time for staging of the assisting party's response and a point of contact at that location.

C.

There shall be frequent consultation between state officials who have assigned emergency management responsibilities and other appropriate representatives of the party states with affected jurisdictions and the United States Government, with free exchange of information, plans, and resource records relating to emergency capabilities.

ARTICLE IV — LIMITATIONS

Any party state requested to render mutual aid or conduct exercises and training for mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided that it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such state.

Each party state shall afford to the emergency forces of any party state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers (except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state), duties, rights, and privileges as are afforded forces of the state in which they are performing emergency services. Emergency forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the emergency services authorities of the state receiving assistance. These conditions may be activated, as needed, only subsequent to a declaration of a state of emergency or disaster by the governor of the party state that is to receive assistance or commencement of exercises or training for mutual aid and shall continue so long as the exercises or training for mutual aid are in progress, the state of emergency or disaster remains in effect or loaned resources remain in the receiving state(s), whichever is longer.

ARTICLE V — LICENSES AND PERMITS

Whenever any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state party to the compact evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, and when such assistance is requested by the receiving party state, such person shall be deemed licensed, certified, or permitted by the state requesting assistance to render aid involving such skill to meet a declared emergency or disaster, subject to such limitations and conditions as the governor of the requesting state may prescribe by executive order or otherwise.

ARTICLE VI — LIABILITY

Officers or employees of a party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be considered agents of the requesting state for tort liability and immunity purposes; and no party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith. Good faith in this article shall not include willful misconduct, gross negligence, or recklessness.

ARTICLE VII — SUPPLEMENTARY AGREEMENTS

Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two or more states may differ from that among the states that are party hereto, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing herein contained shall preclude any state from entering into supplementary agreements with another state or affect any other agreements already in force between states. Supplementary agreements may comprehend, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel, and equipment and supplies.

ARTICLE VIII — COMPENSATION

Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the emergency forces of that state and representatives of deceased members of such forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within their own state.

ARTICLE IX — REIMBURSEMENT

Any party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving such aid for any loss or damage to or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment and the provision of any service in answering a request for aid and for the costs incurred in connection with such requests; provided, that any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part such loss, damage, expense, or other cost, or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party state without charge or cost; and provided further, that any two or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs among those states. Article VIII expenses shall not be reimbursable under this provision.

ARTICLE X — EVACUATION

Plans for the orderly evacuation and interstate reception of portions of the civilian population as the result of any emergency or disaster of sufficient proportions to so warrant, shall be worked out and maintained between the party states and the emergency management/services directors of the various jurisdictions where any type of incident requiring evacuations might occur. Such plans shall be put into effect by request of the state from which evacuees come and shall include the manner of transporting such evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing, and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends, and the forwarding of such evacuees to other areas or the bringing in of additional materials, supplies, and all other relevant factors. Such plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees and the party state from which evacuees come shall mutually agree as to reimbursement of out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for such evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care, and like items. Such expenditures shall be reimbursed as agreed by the party state from which the evacuees come. After the termination of the emergency or disaster, the party state from which the evacuees come shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support of repatriation of such evacuees.

ARTICLE XI — IMPLEMENTATION

A.

This compact shall become operative immediately upon its enactment into law by any two (2) states; thereafter, this compact shall become effective as to any other state upon its enactment by such state.

B.

Any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until 30 days after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of such withdrawal to the governors of all other party states. Such action shall not relieve the withdrawing state from obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

C.

Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of such supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and with the Federal Emergency Management Agency and other appropriate agencies of the United States Government.

ARTICLE XII — VALIDITY

This Act shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in Article I hereof. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of the Act and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

ARTICLE XIII — ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS

Nothing in this compact shall authorize or permit the use of military force by the National Guard of a state at any place outside that state in any emergency for which the President is authorized by law to call into federal service the militia, or for any purpose for which the use of the Army or the Air Force would in the absence of express statutory authorization be prohibited under Section 1385 of Title 18, United States Code.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 959, § 2.

12-75-106. Enforcement.

12-75-121. Utilization of existing services and facilities.

12-75-128. Emergency responders — Immunities and exemptions.